Louisiana, session 2026, HB419.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 9:2800.31 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2800.31. Limitation of liability; greenhouse gas emissions
A.(1) The legislature finds that the production of oil and natural gas is vital
to the economic stability, energy security, and national defense of the United States
of America and this state.
(2) Louisiana's oil and natural gas industries operate under extensive state
and federal regulatory frameworks including environmental permitting, emissions
standards, and conservation laws.
(3) Recent litigation in various jurisdictions have sought to impose liability
on fossil fuel producers based on theories of global or regional climate change,
greenhouse gas emissions, and public nuisance. Such litigation seeks to establish
state or local climate change policy through the courts rather than the legislative or
regulatory process.
Page 1 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1109 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 419
(4) The federal government has recently taken significant deregulatory
actions to reduce greenhouse gas mandates and restore regulatory clarity,
emphasizing energy independence, affordability, and reliability.
(5) It is the intent of this Section to provide clarity regarding civil actions
seeking relief based on alleged contributions to global or regional climate change,
while preserving traditional causes of action for personal injury, property damage,
and violations of law.
B. For purposes of this Section, the following definitions apply:
(1) "Climate change claim" means any civil action based upon an alleged
contribution to climate change arising from the emission of greenhouse gases into
the atmosphere.
(2) "Covered entity" means any manufacturer, producer, processor,
fractionator, refiner, storage operator, pipeline operator, transporter, or seller
engaged in the lawful exploration, production, refining, processing, generation,
transmission, distribution, or sale of oil or natural gas, including enhanced oil
recovery operations.
(3) "Enhanced oil recovery" means the injection of carbon dioxide or other
substances into a reservoir for the primary purpose of increasing the recovery of oil
or natural gas as a part of lawful hydrocarbon production operations.
(4) "Greenhouse gas" means carbon dioxide, methane, nitrous oxide,
hydrofluorocarbons, perfluorocarbons, sulfur hexafluoride, and any other gas
designated as a greenhouse gas pursuant to federal law.
C. No covered entity shall be liable for any climate change claims for lawful
greenhouse gas emissions conducted in material compliance with applicable state
and federal laws and permits.
D. Nothing in this Section shall be construed to limit any of the following
claims:
(1) Physical personal injury.
(2) Tangible property damage.
Page 2 of 4
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-1109 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 419
(3) Groundwater contamination.
(4) Subsurface trespass.
(5) Pipeline rupture or failure.
(6) Gross negligence or willful or wanton misconduct.
(7) Violation of environmental statutes or permit conditions.
(8) Actions brought by the state to enforce environmental laws.
(9) Property rights, including challenges to expropriation or eminent domain
proceedings.
E. The provisions of this Section do not apply to carbon capture and
sequestration activities.